Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-224
Watercourses; wells; reservoirs; regulation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to establish, alter, and change the channel of watercourses, and to wall and cover such watercourses over, to establish, make, and regulate public wells, cisterns, aqueducts, and reservoirs of water, and to provide for the filling of such wells, cisterns, aqueducts, and reservoirs.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXVIII, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 4438;

C.S.1922, § 3822;

C.S.1929, § 15-225;

R.S.1943, § 15-224;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 41.